Hawaii statutes.
§454F-24 Limited exemption for mortgage
loan originators employed by mortgage servicers. An employee who performs
mortgage loan originator activities for a mortgage servicer is exempt from
registration and licensure as a mortgage loan originator; provided that:

(1) The employee's actions are part of the employee's
duties as an employee of the mortgage servicer; and

(2) The employee's mortgage loan originator services
are limited to residential loan modifications and processing the approval of
loan assumptions. [L 2012, c 252, pt of §1; am L 2014, c 198, §10; am L 2016, c
122, §17]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next